District of Columbia statutes.
47-1804.07

Amount.

(a)

Fractional parts of dollar. —

With respect to any amount required to be shown on a return, document or statement filed under this chapter, if such amount is other than a whole-dollar amount, either the fractional part of a dollar shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half dollar or more, in which case the amount (determined without regard to the fractional part of the dollar) shall be increased by $1.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Inapplicability to computation. —

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not be applicable to items which must be taken into account in making the computations necessary to determine the amount required to be shown on a return, document or statement filed under this chapter, but shall be applicable only to such final amount.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 339, § 7
as added June 11, 1982, D.C. Law 4-118, § 105, 29 DCR 1770
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 402(a), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1804.7.
D.C. Law 13-305 repealed subsec. (b) which had read:
“(b) Election not to use whole-dollar amounts.— Any person making a return, statement or other document shall be allowed to make such return, statement or document without regard to subsection (a) of this section.”
Section 410(a) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “(a) Section 402(a) applies for all tax years beginning after December 31, 2001.”